Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1066.
do enact as follows:AB1066,14Section 1. 196.504 (1) (ad) of the statutes is renumbered 196.504 (1) (ah).AB1066,25Section 2. 196.504 (1) (ae) of the statutes is renumbered 196.504 (1) (ak).AB1066,36Section 3. 196.504 (1) (af) of the statutes is created to read:AB1066,2,21196.504 (1) (af) “Farm” means land primarily devoted to an agricultural use, 2as defined in s. Tax 18.05 (1) (a) or (b), Wis. Adm. Code.AB1066,43Section 4. 196.504 (2) (c) 1. i. of the statutes is created to read:AB1066,2,44196.504 (2) (c) 1. i. Projects that expand fiber optic broadband lines to farms.AB1066,2,55